Montana, session 2025, HB693.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 3-5-403, MCA, is amended to read:
"3-5-403. Terms and departments in multijudge districts. (1) In each judicial district that has more
than one judge, as many terms or sessions of court may be held at the same time as there are judges in the
district.
(2) The judges elected or appointed to hold office in each judicial district having more than one
judge shall divide the court into departments, prescribe the order of business, and make rules for the
government of the court. In multijudge districts of greater than five judges, the judges of the district may make
rules implementing specialized dockets among the departments. Each department must be numbered, and
each judge must be assigned to one of the numbered departments.
(3) The judges shall apportion the business of the court among themselves as equally as possible.
In case of their failure for any cause to make the apportionment or to assign each judge to a numbered
department, the supreme court, upon application of any interested person, shall make an order apportioning the
business and assigning each judge to a numbered department and cause the order to be entered upon the
minute book of the district court in each county in the district. The order remains in full force and effect until
modified or repealed by the authority making it. The failure or refusal of any district judge to carry out the terms
of the order constitutes a contempt of the supreme court."
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 693
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 693, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 693
INTRODUCED BY B. MERCER
AN ACT PROVIDING REQUIREMENTS FOR MULTIJUDGE DISTRICTS WITH SPECIALIZED DOCKETS;
PROVIDING RULEMAKING AUTHORITY; AND AMENDING SECTION 3-5-403, MCA.”